Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1718
Sheriff; deputy; uniform; allowance in counties of less than 200,000 population.

County sheriffs and their deputies in counties of less than two hundred thousand population shall each receive an allowance for uniform expense of not less than ten dollars per month, to be paid by the county which such officers serve.

Laws 1967, c. 113, § 2, p. 361.